North Carolina, session 2025, SB371.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-218.7(b) is repealed.
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-218.8(2) is repealed.
SECTION 3. G.S. 115C-218.45 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(j) A charter school shall include on its application for enrollment the school's
performance grade, as determined by the State Board of Education, for the previous five years."
SECTION 4. G.S. 115C-218.94 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.94. Identification of low-performing and continually low-performing charter
schools.
(a) Identification of Low-Performing Charter Schools. – The State Board of Education
shall identify low-performing charter schools on an annual basis. Low-performing charter
schools are those that earn an overall school performance grade of D or F and a school growth
score of "met expected growth" or "not met expected growth" as defined by G.S. 115C-83.15.
(a1) Low-Performing Enrollment. – A charter school that is identified as low-performing
is not authorized to expand enrollment, even if enrollment expansion was planned in the school's
charter, until the school is no longer identified as low-performing.
(b) Identification of Continually Low-Performing Charter Schools. – The State Board of
Education shall identify continually low-performing charter schools on an annual basis. A
continually low-performing charter school is a charter school that has been designated by the
State Board as low-performing for at least two of three consecutive years.
(b1) Continually Low-Performing Charter. – If a charter school is identified as continually
low-performing for four consecutive years, the school's charter shall be revoked. If a charter
*S371-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
school has been identified as continually low-performing for the three consecutive years
immediately preceding the expiration of the school's charter, the Review Board may authorize
the school to operate under its existing charter for one additional year. If the school is no longer
low-performing in the additional year granted under the existing charter, the Review Board may
renew the school's charter."
SECTION 5. G.S. 115C-218.95(b1) reads as rewritten:
"(b1) If a charter school is continually low-performing, the Review Board is authorized to
terminate, not renew, or seek applicants to assume the charter through a competitive bid process
established by the State Board. However, the Review Board shall not terminate or not renew the
charter of a continually low-performing charter school solely for its continually low-performing
status if the charter school has met growth in each of the immediately preceding three school
years or if the charter school has implemented a strategic improvement plan approved by the
Review Board and is making measurable progress toward student performance goals. The State
Board shall develop rules on the assumption of a charter by a new entity that includes all aspects
of the operations of the charter school, including the status of the employees. Public assets shall
transfer to the new entity and shall not revert to the local school administrative unit in which the
charter school is located pursuant to G.S. 115C-218.100(b)."
SECTION 6. G.S. 115C-218.123(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The Review Board shall review and approve a charter or charter modification for the
creation of a remote charter academy that meets the requirements established in this Part for a
term of five three years. The Review Board shall approve a minimum of two statewide remote
charter academies that meet the qualifications of this Part for operation beginning with the
2026-2027 school year and thereafter."
SECTION 7. G.S. 115C-218.124(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) A nonprofit may apply for renewal of the remote charter academy for additional terms
of five three years. The Review Board shall consider compliance with the requirements of this
Part and success of the remote charter academy in the prior five three years in determining
whether to approve a request for renewal of a remote charter academy."
SECTION 8. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 371-First Edition